West Virginia, session 2026, SB374.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Economic Development. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on October 8, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5B-1-9 of this code, relating to the Division of Economic Development (Tourism Development Districts, 145 CSR 16), is authorized. §64-10-2. Division of Forestry. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of 11-1C-11 of this code, modified by the Division of Forestry to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 10, 2025, relating to the Division of Forestry (rules for the certification of managed timberland, 22 CSR 06), is authorized. §64-10-3. Division of Labor. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §21-6-11 of this code, modified by the Division of Labor to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 10, 2025, relating to the Division of Labor (child labor, 42 CSR 09), is authorized. §64-10-4. Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 24, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22A-1-6 of this code, relating to the Office of Miners' Health, Safety, and Training (submission and approval of a comprehensive Mine Safety Program for coal mining operations in the State of West Virginia, 56 CSR 08), is authorized. §64-10-5. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (small arms hunting, 58 CSR 14), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-2D-3 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 11, 2025, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (wildlife rehabilitation, 58 CSR 21), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-7-23 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special boating, 58 CSR 26), is authorized with the following amendment: On page 7, by striking out all of subdivision 3.1.103. and inserting in lieu thereof a new subdivision 3.1.103. to read as follows: 3.1.103. Stonecoal (Lewis and Upshur counties):  Motorboat operators must observe no-wake zones marked by buoys or posted signs which are approved by the Director. Motorboats of greater than 10 horsepower may only operate in a manner where no wake is created. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (defining terms used in hunting and trapping, 58 CSR 46), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (prohibitions when hunting and trapping, 58 CSR 47), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (deer hunting, 58 CSR 50), is authorized.The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (special migratory game bird hunting, 58 CSR 56), is authorized. §64-10-6. Division of Rehabilitation Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §18-10L-6 of this code, relating to the Rehabilitation Services (Ron Yost Personal Assistance Services Act Board, 198 CSR 01), is authorized. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home